Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1309
Provisional environmental health specialist.

Any person meeting the educational qualifications of section 38-1308 but who does not meet the experience requirements of such section may make application for certification as a provisional environmental health specialist.

Laws 1963, c. 400, § 4, p. 1280;

Laws 1989, LB 344, § 29;

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 40;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 118;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3704;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 530.